Colorado statutes. Title 38. Property - Real and Personal
Article 24.5. Harvesters’ Liens

38-24.5-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Harvester” means any person who gathers in grain or other crops by manual or mechanical threshing, swathing, or picking but shall not include an owner.

“Harvesting” means the manual or mechanical threshing, swathing, cutting, or picking of grain or other crops, including any services rendered and labor performed in connection therewith.

“Owner” means any person, including any guardian or minor, married person, company, firm, association, or corporation, for whose use or benefit the grain or other crops are harvested.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1442, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-102.
Who may have lien - amount.

Every harvester shall have a lien upon the grain and other crops harvested for and on account of harvesting. A lien on grain or other crops shall be charged for at the prevailing price for a particular locality in which such grain or other crop is harvested after notice has been given and a lien has been filed within the time provided under section 38-24.5-103.

If the prevailing price for harvesting is disputed by the harvester or the owner, the matter may be submitted to arbitration under the provisions of rule 109 of the Colorado rules of civil procedure.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1442, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-103.
How lien obtained - lien statement.

Every person intending to avail himself or herself of the benefits of this article shall serve on the owner by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested, or by personal service, within ten days after completing the harvesting, a notice that, within twenty days, a lien, as specified in section 38-24.5-102, shall be claimed, and, within said twenty days, such person shall file in the same locations for farm products and crops as provided in section 4-9-501, C.R.S., a statement containing a just and true account of the amount due him or her for such harvesting, after allowing all just credits and offsets, and containing a correct description of the grain or other crops to be charged with such lien, the price agreed upon for such harvesting, the name of the person, firm, or corporation for whom such harvesting was performed, a legal description of the lands upon which said grain or other crops were raised, a description of the legal subdivision of land upon which said grain or other crops are stored and, if said grain or other crops are stored in a storage facility, the locality of the storage facility, which statement of facts shall be verified by affidavit of the person claiming such lien or his or her duly authorized agent or attorney having knowledge of the facts, and a copy of the notice of intent to file a lien and an affidavit of service or mailing thereof. Any immaterial error or mistake in the account or description of the grain or other crops or of the property upon which it was raised shall not invalidate such lien.

If the grain or other crops so harvested will be hauled directly to the storage facility or to a purchaser, the person claiming the lien pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall also serve written notice upon the owner of such storage facility or other private purchaser of his intent to claim and file a lien upon said grain or other crops for harvesting pursuant to section 38-24.5-102 within the time frames set forth in this section.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

(1) amended, p. 1447, § 44, effective July 1.

38-24.5-104.
Filing with county clerk and recorder.

The county clerk and recorder shall endorse upon a lien the day of its filing and make an abstract thereof in a book kept and indexed by him for that purpose containing the date of the filing, the name of the person claiming the lien, the amount thereof, the name of any other person against whose property the lien is filed, and a description of the property to be charged with the same.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-105.
Priority.

The lien for harvesting specified in section 38-24.5-102 shall not be prior to nor have precedence over any mortgage, encumbrance, security interest, or other valid lien upon the grain or other crops if such other mortgage, encumbrance, security interest, or valid lien attached or was filed prior to the filing of a lien under this article.

A person seeking to perfect a lien under this article shall comply with article 9.5 of title 4, C.R.S., and section 1324 of the federal “Food Security Act of 1985”, in order to perfect a lien under this article.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-106.
Parties.

Any person interested in the matter in controversy or the property to be charged with the lien or having a lien thereon may be made a party to an action for the foreclosure thereof.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-107.
Limitations of actions.

Any action for the foreclosure and enforcement of a lien authorized in section 38-24.5-102 shall be commenced, and a notice of commencement of action filed in the same locations as the lien statements, within three months from the filing of the lien and shall be filed in the district court for the county in which the lien authorized in section 38-24.5-103 is filed. The failure to file such an action and notice on a timely basis shall render the lien null and void.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1443, § 1, effective July 1.

38-24.5-108.
Acknowledgment of satisfaction of lien - penalty.

Whenever the indebtedness which is a lien upon any such grain or other crops is paid and satisfied, it is the duty of the lienor to acknowledge satisfaction thereof and to discharge the lien of record; and, if any lienor fails to acknowledge satisfaction and discharge said lien within thirty days after being requested to do so by a person having a property interest in such grain or other crops, he is liable to any person injured thereby in the amount of such injury and the costs of the action.

History.

Source:
L. 89:

Entire article added, p. 1444, § 1, effective July 1.